en: Unsalted boiled pearled barley, Unsalted pearled barley cooked in water
fr: Orge perlée bouillie non salée, Orge perlée cuite à l'eau non salée

en: Buckwheat, whole buckwheat
af: bokwiet
ar: حنطة سوداء
az: əkin qarabaşağı
ba: ҡарабойҙай
be: грэчка
bg: елда
bo: བྲ་བོ།
br: gwinizh-du
ca: fajol
cs: pohanka
cv: хура тулă
cy: gwenith yr hydd
da: boghvede
de: Buchweizen
el: πολύγονον
eo: fagopiro
es: Trigo sarraceno, Alforfón
et: harilik tatar
eu: suge-ilar, artobeltz
fa: گندم سیاه
fi: tattari
fr: Sarrasin, blés noirs fourragers, graines de sarrasin, Sarrasin entier cru
fy: boekweet
ga: ruán
gl: trigo mouro
he: כוסמת
hi: कूटू
hr: heljde, heljda
hu: hajdina
hy: հնդկացորեն ցանովի
io: saraceno
is: bókhveiti
it: Grano saraceno
ja: ソバ
kk: егістік қарақұмық
kn: ಬಕ್‍ಹ್ವೀಟ್
ko: 메밀
kw: ys du
ky: кара күрүч
la: Fagopyrum esculentum
lt: grikiai, pilnagrūdžiai grikiai
lv: griķi
mi: witi paka
mk: елда
mn: гурвалжин будаа
ms: gandum kuda
nb: bokhvete
ne: फापर
nl: Boekweit
nn: bokkveite
oc: blat negre
os: сауфагæ
pl: gryka, gryka zwyczajna
pt: trigo mourisco
ro: hrișcă
ru: Гречиха посевная, Гречиха съедобная, Греча
sh: heljda
sk: pohánka jedlá
sl: ajda, navadna ajda
sr: heljda, хељда
sv: bovete
ta: நெளிகோதுமை
th: บักวีต
tl: hayang trigo
tr: karabuğday
tt: кара бодай
uk: гречка
ur: گندم سیاه
uz: marjumak
vi: kiều mạch
wa: boûkete
zh: 蕎麥, 荞麦

en: Seeds, Grains
bg: Семена
ca: Llavors i grans
cs: Semínka
da: Frø, korn, kerner
de: Samen, Körner
es: Semillas, Granos, Simientes, Pepitas
fi: siemenet
fr: Graines
he: זרעים
hr: sjemenke
hu: Magok, Szemes termékek
it: Semi
lt: Sėklos, Grūdai
nl: Zaden
pl: Nasiona, Ziarna
pt: Sementes, Grãos
ru: Зёрна
zh: 种子, 谷物

en: Mixed seeds, Seed mixes
fr: Mélanges de graines
nl: Zaadmengsels

en: Chia, Dried chia seeds, chia seeds
xx: Chia
bg: Чиа
da: Chiafrø
es: Semillas de chía, Chía
fr: Chia, graines de chia, Graines de chia séchées
ja: チアシード
la: Salvia hispanica
lt: Chia sėklos
pt: Sementes de chia
sv: Chiafrön

en: white chia
nl: witte chiazaad

en: black chia
nl: zwarte chiazaad

en: Coix
xx: Coix
de: Hirsearten
hr: Koix

en: Job's Tears
de: Hiobsträne
es: Lágrimas de Job
fr: Coix lacryma-jobi
hr: Poslovne suze
la: Coix lacryma-jobi
nl: Jobstranen

en: Corn, Maize
bg: Царевица
de: Mais
es: Maíz
fi: maissi
fr: Maïs
hr: Kukuruz
it: Mais
la: Zea mays subsp. mays
lt: Kukurūzai
nl: Mais, Maïs
pl: Kukurydza
pt: Milho
tr: Mısır
zh: 玉米

en: Sweet corn
bg: Сладка царевица
de: Zuckermais, süße Maise
es: Maíz dulce
fi: makea maissi
fr: Maïs doux, Maïs sucré, Maïs doux en grains
hr: Slatki kukuruz
it: Mais dolce
ja: トウモロコシ, とうもろこし, 玉蜀黍, スイートコーン
la: Zea mays subsp. mays var. rugosa, Zea mays var. saccharata
lt: Saldieji kukurūzai
nl: Suikermais
zh: 甜玉米

en: Fresh sweet corn
fr: Maïs doux frais

en: Sweet corn on the cob
fr: Maïs doux en épis

en: Cooked sweet corn on the cob
fr: Epis de Maïs cuit, Maïs doux en épis cuit

en: Corn grain, Maize grain
fr: Maïs en grain
hr: Zrno kukuruza
nl: Maiskorrels

en: Fresh corn, Fresh maize
fr: Maïs frais

en: Crabgrass, Finger-grass
de: Fingerhirsen Digitaria
es: Digitarias
fr: Digitaires, Digitaria
hr: Svračica
la: Digitaria
nl: Vingergras

en: Digitaria cruciata
xx: Digitaria cruciata
de: Digitaria Cruciata
es: Digitaria cruciata
fr: Raishan
hr: Digitaria cruciata
la: Digitaria cruciata, Digitaria compacta

en: Digitaria iburua
xx: Digitaria iburua
de: Digitaria Iburua
es: Digitaria iburua
fr: Fonio noir
hr: Digitaria iburua
la: Digitaria iburua

en: Fonio
de: Foniohirse
es: Mijo fonio
fr: Fonio blanc
hr: Fonio
la: Digitaria exilis
nl: Fonio